Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5991.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12.3-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12.3 entitled "Health
Care for Children and Pregnant Women" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12.3-3. Medical assistance expansion for pregnancy/RIte Start.
(a) The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized to
amend its Title XIX state plan pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act to provide Medicaid
coverage and to amend its Title XXI state plan pursuant to Title XXI of the Social Security Act to
provide medical assistance coverage through expanded family income disregards for pregnant
persons whose family income levels are between one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) and two
hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level. The department is further authorized to
promulgate any regulations necessary and in accord with Title XIX [42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.] and
Title XXI [42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.] of the Social Security Act necessary in order to implement
said state plan amendment. The services provided shall be in accord with Title XIX [42 U.S.C. §
1396 et seq.] and Title XXI [42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.] of the Social Security Act.
(b) The secretary of health and human services is authorized and directed to establish a
payor of last resort program to cover prenatal, delivery and postpartum care. The program shall
cover the cost of maternity care for any person who lacks health insurance coverage for maternity
care and who is not eligible for medical assistance under Title XIX [42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.] and
Title XXI [42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.] of the Social Security Act including, but not limited to, a

noncitizen pregnant person lawfully admitted for permanent residence on or after August 22, 1996,
without regard to the availability of federal financial participation, provided such pregnant person
satisfies all other eligibility requirements. The secretary shall promulgate regulations to implement
this program. Such regulations shall include specific eligibility criteria; the scope of services to be
covered; procedures for administration and service delivery; referrals for non-covered services;
outreach; and public education.
(c) The secretary of health and human services may enter into cooperative agreements with
the department of health and/or other state agencies to provide services to individuals eligible for
services under subsections (a) and (b) above.
(d) The following services shall be provided through the program:
(1) Ante-partum and postpartum care;
(2) Delivery;
(3) Cesarean section;
(4) Newborn hospital care;
(5) Inpatient transportation from one hospital to another when authorized by a medical
provider; and
(6) Prescription medications and laboratory tests.
(e) The secretary of health and human services shall provide enhanced services, as
appropriate, to pregnant persons as defined in subsections (a) and (b), as well as to other pregnant
persons eligible for medical assistance. These services shall include: care coordination; nutrition
and social service counseling; high-risk obstetrical care; childbirth and parenting preparation
programs; smoking cessation programs; outpatient counseling for drug-alcohol use; interpreter
services; mental health services; and home visitation. The provision of enhanced services is subject
to available appropriations. In the event that appropriations are not adequate for the provision of
these services, the executive office has the authority to limit the amount, scope, and duration of
these enhanced services.
(f) The executive office of health and human services shall provide for extended family
planning services for up to twenty-four (24) months postpartum. These services shall be available
to persons who have been determined eligible for RIte Start or for medical assistance under Title
XIX [42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.] or Title XXI [42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.] of the Social Security
Act.
(g) Effective October 1, 2022, individuals eligible for RIte Start pursuant to this section or
for medical assistance under Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act while pregnant
(including during a period of retroactive eligibility), are eligible for full Medicaid benefits through
LC001981 - Page 2 of 4

the last day of the month in which their twelve-month (12) postpartum period ends. This benefit
will be provided to eligible Rhode Island residents without regard to the availability of federal
financial participation. The executive office of health and human services is directed to ensure that
federal financial participation is used to the maximum extent allowable to provide coverage
pursuant to this section, and that state-only funds will be used only if federal financial participation
is not available.
(h) Any person eligible for services under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, or
otherwise eligible for medical assistance under Title XIX [42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.] and Title XXI
[42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.] of the Social Security Act, shall also be entitled to services for any
termination of pregnancy permitted under § 23-4.13-2; provided, however, that no federal funds
shall be used to pay for such services, except as authorized under federal law.
(i) The executive office of health and human services shall provide for self-measured blood
pressure monitoring services for pregnant and postpartum persons as medically necessary. These
services shall be available to persons who have been determined eligible for RIte Start or for
medical assistance under Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act. Coverage for self-
measured blood pressure monitoring shall include the provision of validated home blood pressure
monitors, and reimbursement of health care provider and other staff time used for patient training,
transmission of blood pressure data, interpretation of blood pressure readings and reporting, and
the delivery of co-interventions, including educational materials or classes, behavioral change
management, and medication management. This benefit will be provided to eligible Rhode Island
residents without regard to the availability of federal financial participation. The executive office
of health and human services is directed to ensure that federal financial participation is used to the
maximum extent allowable to provide coverage pursuant to this section, and that state-only funds
will be used only if federal financial participation is not available.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001981
========
LC001981 - Page 3 of 4